Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.120

Disenfranchisement or discrimination.

An election officer or a person who intentionally disenfranchises an eligible citizen or discriminates against a person eligible to vote by denying voter registration is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2106. Prior: 2001 c 41 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.07.405.]